Illinois, session 104th, HB917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1058 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1058 new)8    Sec. 605-1058. Flagship cultural district.9    (a) As used in this Section, "flagship cultural district" 10means a geographic area in a municipality with a population 11greater than 500,000 that is certified under this Section as 12an area in which the arts, entertainment, history, and culture 13are provided.14    (b) Municipalities or organizations working on behalf of a 15certified flagship cultural district should seek to:16        (1) promote the State and the flagship cultural 17    district's host municipality as a flagship world hub for 18    arts, entertainment, history, and culture;19        (2) encourage economic development and support 20    entrepreneurship in the certified geographic area and 21    community, particularly in the fields of arts, 22    entertainment, and culture and supporting industries;23        (3) encourage the preservation and development of   HB0917 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04815 SPS 14842 b1    historic and culturally significant structures, 2    traditions, and languages;3        (4) foster local cultural development and education;4        (5) provide a focal point for celebrating and 5    strengthening the unique cultural identity of the State 6    and the flagship cultural district's host municipality;7        (6) promote growth and opportunity without generating 8    displacement or expanding inequality; and9        (7) promote tourism and further enhance the State and 10    the flagship cultural district's host municipality's place 11    as a global destination.12    (c) The Department shall establish criteria and guidelines 13for designation of a flagship cultural district by rule in 14accordance with qualifying criteria outlined in subsection 15(d). In executing its powers and duties under this Section, 16the Department shall:17        (1) establish an application system by which a 18    501(c)(3) organization may apply for certification as a 19    flagship cultural district;20        (2) provide technical assistance for a flagship 21    cultural district by collaborating with all relevant 22    offices and grantees of the Department to help them 23    identify and achieve their goals for cultural 24    preservation, including, but not limited to, promotional 25    support of the flagship cultural district and support for 26    small businesses looking to access resources; and  HB0917 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 04815 SPS 14842 b1        (3) collaborate with other State agencies, units of 2    local government, community organizations, and private 3    entities to maximize the benefits of the flagship cultural 4    district.5    (d) A geographic area in a municipality with a population 6greater than 500,000 may be certified as a flagship cultural 7district by applying to the Department for certification. 8Certification as a flagship cultural district shall be for a 9period of 10 years, after which the district may renew 10certification every 5 years. Any applicant for certification 11on behalf of a geographic area shall be a 501(c)(3) 12organization. The applying entity is responsible for complying 13with reporting requirements under subsection (f). The 14Department shall develop criteria to assess whether an 15applicant qualifies for certification under this Section. That 16criteria must include a demonstration that the applicant and 17the community that they can provide:18        (1) a unified and inclusive approach to creating 19    cultural engagement opportunities within its designated 20    geographic area; and 21        (2) strong community support for the flagship cultural 22    district designation through participation by community 23    organizations and state, regional, and municipal 24    government agencies or officials.25    (e) No later than September 30, 2026, the Department shall 26award one flagship cultural district.  HB0917 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 04815 SPS 14842 b1    (f) Within 12 months after being designated a flagship 2cultural district, the flagship cultural district shall submit 3a report to the Department detailing its current programs and 4goals for the next 4 years of its designation. For each year 5thereafter that the district remains a flagship cultural 6district, it shall submit a report to the Department on the 7status of the programs and future developments of the 8district. Any flagship cultural district that fails to file a 9report for 2 consecutive years shall lose its status as a 10flagship cultural district. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.